Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 7. Conditional Sales of Equipment

§ 37-9-701.
Contracts valid; conditions to validation against subsequent purchaser for value.

In any contract for the sale of railroad or street railway equipment or rolling stock, it shall be lawful to agree that the title to the property sold or contracted to be sold, although possession thereof may be delivered immediately, or at any time or times subsequently, shall not vest in the purchaser until the purchase price shall be fully paid, or that the seller shall have and retain a lien thereon for the unpaid purchase money. And in any contract for the leasing or hiring of such property, it shall be lawful to stipulate for a conditional sale thereof at the termination of such contract, and that the rentals or amounts to be received under such contract, may, as paid, be applied and treated as purchase money, and that the title to the property shall not vest in the lessee or bailee until the purchase price shall have been paid in full, and until the terms of the contract shall have been fully performed, notwithstanding delivery to and possession by such lessee or bailee; provided, that no such contract shall be valid as against any subsequent judgment creditor, or any subsequent bona fide purchaser for value and without notice, unless:

The same shall be evidenced by an instrument executed by the parties and duly acknowledged by the vendee or lessee or bailee, as the case may be, or duly proved, before some person authorized by law to take acknowledgment of deeds, and in the same manner as deeds are acknowledged or proved;

Such instrument shall be filed for record in the office of the secretary of state;

Each locomotive engine, or car so sold, leased or hired, or contracted to be sold, leased or hired as aforesaid, shall have the name of the vendor, lessor, or bailor plainly marked on each side thereof, followed by the word “owner” or “lessor” or “bailor”, as the case may be.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 124, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2839; C.S. 1910, § 3747; C.S. 1920, § 4715; R.S. 1931, § 96-501; C.S. 1945, § 65-701; W.S. 1957, § 37-231.

Cross references. —

As to execution and effect of mortgages and trust deeds on railroad property, see §§

37-9-101

to

37-9-104

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 37-9-702.
Chattel mortgage laws not to apply.

Statutes relating to the filing, recording, interpretation, or validity of chattel mortgages shall not affect the recording, interpretation, or validity of contracts of the character hereinbefore named, but the same shall be controlled by the provisions of this act [§§

37-9-701

through

37-9-703

] alone. And the contracts hereinbefore named shall not be affected by the provisions of chapter 40, Session Laws of 1895 [repealed].

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 124, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2842; C.S. 1910, § 3750; C.S. 1920, § 4718; R.S. 1931, § 96-503; C.S. 1945, § 65-703; W.S. 1957, § 37-232.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 40, Laws 1895, relating to conditional sales contracts and referred to in this section, was repealed by § 10-101, ch. 219, Laws 1961. As to secured transaction provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, see §§ 34.1-9-101 to 34.1-9-507.

§ 37-9-703.
Contracts to be filed; provisions for release; fees.

The contracts herein authorized, or a certified copy thereof, shall be filed by the secretary of state in a special file to be kept for that purpose. On payment in full of the purchase money, and the performance of the terms and conditions stipulated in any such contract, a declaration in writing to that effect may be made by the vendor, lessor, or bailor, or his or its assignee, which declaration may be made on the contract or certified copy thereof, duly attested, or it may be made by a separate instrument, to be acknowledged by the vendor, lessor, or bailor or his or its assignee, and filed as aforesaid. The secretary of state shall collect a fee of five dollars ($5.00), for filing each of said contracts, and a fee of two dollars ($2.00) for filing each of said declarations, and a fee of one dollar ($1.00) for noting such declaration on the margin of the contract or certified copy thereof.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 124, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2840; C.S. 1910, § 3748; C.S. 1920, § 4716; R.S. 1931, § 96-502; Laws 1943, ch. 81, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 65-702; W.S. 1957, § 37-233.